Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.280

Student loans—Federal student aid programs.

The boards of regents of the state universities and the boards of trustees of regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and community and technical college districts may each create student loan funds, and qualify and participate in the National Defense Education Act of 1958 and such other similar federal student aid programs as are or may be enacted from time to time, and to that end may comply with all of the laws of the United States, and all of the rules, regulations and requirements promulgated pursuant thereto.

[ 2015 c 55 s 202; 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 11; 1970 ex.s. c 15 s 27; 1969 ex.s. c 222 s 2; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.10.280. Prior: 1959 c 191 s 1. Formerly RCW 28.76.420.]

NOTES:

Severability—Nomenclature—Savings—1977 ex.s. c 169: See notes following RCW 28B.10.016.

Severability—1970 ex.s. c 15: See note following RCW 28A.230.160.

Legislative declaration—1969 ex.s. c 222: "The legislature hereby declares that it regards the higher education of its qualified domiciliaries to be a public purpose of great importance to the welfare and security of this state and nation; and further declares that the establishment of a student financial aid program, assisting financially needy or disadvantaged students in this state to be a desirable and economical method of furthering this purpose. The legislature has concluded that the benefit to the state in assuring the development of the talents of its qualified domiciliaries will bring tangible benefits to the state in the future.

The legislature further declares that there is an urgent need at present for the establishment of a state of Washington student financial aid program, and that the most efficient and economical way to meet this need is through the plan prescribed in this act." [ 1969 ex.s. c 222 s 6.]

State educational trust fund—Established—Deposits—Use: RCW 28B.92.140.